Vermont, session 2025-2026, H627.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 13 V.S.A. § 4821 is amended to read:
§ 4821. NOTICE OF HEARING; PROCEDURES
(a) The person who is the subject of the proceedings, his or her the person’s
attorney, the legal guardian, if any, the Commissioner of Mental Health or the
Commissioner of Disabilities, Aging, and Independent Living, and the State’s
Attorney or other prosecuting officer representing the State in the case shall be
given notice of the time and place of a hearing under 4820 of this title. The
notice shall be provided by the State’s Attorney or other prosecuting officer
representing the State in the case to any victim of the offense for which the
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 2 of 10
person has been charged who has not opted out of receiving the notice.
Procedures for hearings for persons with a mental illness shall be as provided
in 18 V.S.A. chapter 181. Procedures for hearings for persons with an
intellectual disability shall be as provided in 18 V.S.A. chapter 206, subchapter
3.
(b) The court shall maintain a system for a person to file notice that the
person is a victim in a proceeding under this chapter.
(c) The State’s Attorney or other prosecuting officer representing the State
in the case shall ensure that all victims of record are notified of their rights
under this chapter and made aware of the option to receive notifications from
the court pursuant to this section.
(d) As used in this chapter, “victim” has the same meaning as in section
5301 of this title.
Sec. 2. 13 V.S.A. § 4822 is amended to read:
§ 4822. FINDINGS AND ORDER; PERSONS WITH A MENTAL ILLNESS
(a) If the court finds that the person is a person in need of treatment or a
patient in need of further treatment as defined in 18 V.S.A. § 7101, the court
shall issue an order of commitment directed to the Commissioner of Mental
Health that shall admit the person to the care and custody of the Department of
Mental Health for a period of 90 days. In any case involving personal injury or
threat of personal injury, the committing court may issue an order requiring a
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 3 of 10
court hearing before a person committed under this section may be discharged
from custody.
* * *
(c)(1) Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this section, at
least 10 30 days prior to the proposed discharge of any person committed
under this section, the Commissioner of Mental Health shall give notice of the
discharge to the committing court, to any victim of the offense for which the
person has been charged who has not opted out of receiving the notice, and to
the State’s Attorney of the county where the prosecution originated. In all
cases requiring a hearing prior to discharge of a person found incompetent to
stand trial under section 4817 of this title, the hearing shall be conducted by the
committing court issuing the order under that section. In all other cases, when
the committing court orders a hearing under subsection (a) of this section or
when, in the discretion of the Commissioner of Mental Health, a hearing
should be held prior to the discharge, the hearing shall be held in the Family
Division of the Superior Court to determine if the committed person is no
longer a person in need of treatment or a patient in need of further treatment as
set forth in subsection (a) of this section. Notice of the hearing shall be given
to the Commissioner, the State’s Attorney of the county where the prosecution
originated, the committed person, and the person’s attorney. The State’s
Attorney of the county where the prosecution originated shall provide notice of
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 4 of 10
the hearing to any victim of the offense for which the person has been charged
who has not opted out of receiving the notice. Prior to the hearing, the State’s
Attorney may enter an appearance in the proceedings and may request
examination of the patient by an independent psychiatrist, who may testify at
the hearing.
(2)(A) This subdivision (2) shall apply when a person is committed to
the care and custody of the Commissioner of Mental Health under this section
after having been found:
(i) not guilty by reason of insanity; or
(ii) incompetent to stand trial, provided that the person’s criminal
case has not been dismissed.
(B)(i) When a person has been committed under this section, the
Commissioner shall provide notice to the State’s Attorney of the county where
the prosecution originated or to the Office of the Attorney General if that office
prosecuted the case and to any victim of the offense for which the person has
been charged who has not opted out of receiving the notice:
(I) at least 10 30 days prior to discharging the person from:
(aa) the care and custody of the Commissioner; or
(bb) a hospital or a secure residential recovery facility to the
community on an order of nonhospitalization pursuant to 18 V.S.A. § 7618;
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 5 of 10
(II) at least 10 30 days prior to the expiration of a commitment
order issued under this section if the Commissioner does not seek continued
treatment; or
(III) any time that the person elopes from the custody of the
Commissioner.
(ii) When the State’s Attorney or Attorney General receives notice
under subdivision (i) of this subdivision (B), the Office shall provide notice of
the action to any victim of the offense for which the person has been charged
who has not opted out of receiving notice. A victim receiving notice pursuant
to this subdivision (ii) has the right to be heard by the court or to submit a
victim impact statement to the Family Division of the Superior Court in
writing or through the State’s Attorney or Attorney General’s office. The
victim may express views concerning the offense and preferences for the
person’s placement and care, and the court shall consider the victim’s
testimony in its decision.
(iii) As used in this subdivision (B), “victim” has the same
meaning as in section 5301 of this title.
(d) The court may continue the hearing provided in subsection (c) of this
section for a period of 15 additional days upon a showing of good cause. The
court shall continue the hearing if the victim has not been provided with the
notice required by this section.
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 6 of 10
(e) If the court determines that commitment shall no longer be necessary, it
shall issue an order discharging the patient from the custody of the Department
of Mental Health.
(f) The court shall issue its findings and order not later than 15 days from
the date of hearing.
Sec. 3. 13 V.S.A. § 5305 is amended to read:
§ 5305. INFORMATION CONCERNING RELEASE FROM CUSTODY
(a) Victims and affected persons shall have the right to request timely
notification by the agency having custody of the defendant before the
defendant is released, including a release on bail or conditions of release,
furlough, or other community program; upon termination or discharge from
probation; or whenever the defendant escapes, is recaptured, dies, or receives a
pardon or commutation of sentence; or when the defendant is transferred from
a secure or staff-secure setting to a community-based setting in any case
involving personal injury or threat of personal injury. Notice shall be given to
the victim or affected person as expeditiously as possible at the address or
telephone number provided to the agency having custody of the defendant by
the person requesting notice. Any address or telephone number so provided
shall be kept confidential. The prosecutor’s office shall ensure that victims are
made aware of their right to notification of an offender’s scheduled release
date pursuant to this section. Notwithstanding this subsection, the right to
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 7 of 10
information for victims of delinquent acts is governed by 33 V.S.A. chapters
52 and 52A.
(b) If the defendant is released on conditions at arraignment, the
prosecutor’s office shall inform the victim of a listed crime of the conditions of
release in a timely manner.
(c) If requested by a victim of a listed crime, the Department of Corrections
shall:
(1) at least 30 days before a parole board hearing concerning the
defendant, inform the victim of the hearing and of the victim’s right to testify
before the parole board or to submit a written statement for the parole board to
consider; and
(2) promptly inform the victim of the decision of the parole board,
including providing to the victim any conditions attached to the defendant’s
release on parole.
Sec. 4. 13 V.S.A. § 4826 is added to read:
§ 4826. VICTIM LIAISON
(a) There is created the position of Victim Liaison for Forensic Cases in the
Department of Mental Health.
(b) The Victim Liaison shall:
(1) assist victims by providing information and guidance on Department
of Mental Health policies and procedures related to forensic cases;
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 8 of 10
(2) coordinate with the Attorney General’s office and the Department of
State’s Attorneys and Sheriffs regarding forensic cases; and
(3) assist victims in navigating court systems and law enforcement
agencies in forensic cases.
Sec. 5. VICTIM LIAISON FOR FORENSIC CASES; POSITION
CREATED; APPROPRIATION
(a) One full-time, classified permanent Victim Liaison for Forensic Cases
position is created in the Department of Mental Health.
(b) There is appropriated to the Department of Health from the General
Fund in fiscal year 2027 the sum of $115,000.00 for one Victim Liaison for
Forensic Cases.
Sec. 6. REPORT; DEPARTMENT OF MENTAL HEALTH; VICTIMS’
RIGHTS IN FORENSIC CASES
(a)(1) On or before November 1, 2026, the Department of Mental Health
shall report to the House Committees on Judiciary, on Health Care, and on
Human Services and the Senate Committees on Judiciary and on Health and
Welfare on improving victims’ rights and experiences in forensic cases in
Vermont.
(2) For purposes of the report required by this section, the Department
shall consult with:
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 9 of 10
(A) the Chief Superior Judge or designee;
(B) the Attorney General or designee;
(C) the Executive Director of the Department of State’s Attorneys
and Sheriffs or designee;
(D) the Executive Director of the Vermont Center for Crime Victim
Services or designee;
(E) the Executive Director of Vermont Legal Aid or designee;
(F) the Defender General or designee;
(G) the Executive Director of the Vermont Network Against
Domestic and Sexual Violence or designee; and
(H) victims with lived experience in forensic cases.
(b) The report required by this section shall include:
(1) recommendations to improve victim access to and participation in
court proceedings involving forensic cases;
(2) recommendations to improve victim access to information in
forensic cases, including the development of a court release form allowing
persons who are found not guilty by reason of insanity or incompetent to stand
trial to provide victims with access to basic information about the person’s
location and reasonable notice of the person’s court proceedings; and
VT LEG #386258 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.627
2026 Page 10 of 10
(3) an assessment of any discrepancies between statutory requirements
and current practices as they relate to victims’ rights and notification in
forensic cases.
Sec. 7. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on passage.
VT LEG #386258 v.1